Idaho, session 2026, H0593.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. IDAHO CODE CLEANUP -- LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent
of the Legislature to ensure that the state laws provided in Idaho Code are
streamlined, up-to-date, and essential for the citizens of Idaho, while best
serving the public health, safety, and welfare. In accordance with the Idaho
Code Cleanup Act, following comprehensive review, the Legislature has iden-
tified the provisions of this act as obsolete, outdated, or unnecessary.
SECTION 2. That Section 39-5803, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-5803. DEFINITIONS. As used in this chapter:
(1) "Panel" means the site review panel created in section 39-5812,
Idaho Code.
(2) "Committee" means the state hazardous waste management planning
committee created in section 39-5805, Idaho Code.
(3) (2) "Department" means the department of environmental quality.
(4) (3) "Designated facility" means a hazardous waste treatment, stor-
age or disposal facility that has received a permit or has interim status un-
der title II of the solid waste disposal act or has a permit from the state
authorized under section 3006 of title II of the solid waste disposal act (42
U.S.C. 6926).
(5) (4) "Director" means the director of the department of environmen-
tal quality.
(6) (5) "Disposal" is defined in section 39-4403, Idaho Code.
(7) (6) "Disposal facility" means a facility or a part of a facility at
which managed hazardous waste, as defined by rule, is intentionally placed
into or on any land or water and at which hazardous waste will remain after
closure.
(8) (7) "Generator" is defined in section 39-4403, Idaho Code.


(9) (8) "Hazardous waste" is defined in section 39-4403, Idaho Code.
(10) (9) "Hazardous waste management" is defined in section 39-4403,
Idaho Code.
(11) (10) "On-site" means on the same or geographically contiguous
property that may be divided by a public or private right-of-way if the
entrance and exit between the pieces of property are at a crossroads inter-
section and access is by crossing rather than going along the right-of-way.
Noncontiguous pieces of property owned by the same person but connected by
a right-of-way that the owner controls and to which the public does not have
access is also considered on-site property.
(12) (11) "Operator" means the person responsible for the overall oper-
ation of a disposal, treatment or storage facility with approval of the di-
rector either by contract or permit.
(13) (12) "Person" is defined in section 39-4403, Idaho Code.
(14) (13) "Plan" means the state hazardous waste management plan
prepared under the provisions of section 39-5806, Idaho Code.
(15) (14) "Storage" is defined in section 39-4403, Idaho Code.
(16) (15) "Storage facility" means a facility or part of a facility at
which managed hazardous waste, as defined by rule and regulation, is subject
to storage.
(17) (16) "Title II of the solid waste disposal act" means sections 1001
through 8006 of public law 89-272, 42 U.S.C. 6901, 6902 through 6910, 6912
through 6940, and 6942 through 6986.
For purposes of this chapter, words and phrases defined in section
39-4403, Idaho Code, shall carry the same meaning when used in this chapter
unless the context clearly denotes otherwise.
SECTION 3. That Section 39-5804, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-5804. METHODS OF HAZARDOUS WASTE MANAGEMENT. The department and
the committee in the conduct of their its duties under the provisions of this
chapter and under the provisions of chapter 44, title 39, Idaho Code, shall
assist in encouraging, developing and implementing methods of hazardous
waste management which are environmentally sound, which maximize the uti-
lization of valuable resources and which encourage resource conservation
including source separation and waste reduction.
SECTION 4. That Section 39-5805, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 5. That Section 39-5806, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 6. That Section 39-5807, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 7. That Section 39-5809, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.


SECTION 8. That Section 39-5810, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
39-5810. LICENSES -- ISSUANCE AFTER ADOPTION OF PLAN. After the plan
has been adopted by the committee, the The director shall not issue a license
under the provisions of this chapter for a hazardous waste treatment, stor-
age or disposal facility until the director has made a determination that
the action is consistent with the adopted hazardous waste management plan.
The director may exempt classes or categories of hazardous waste treatment,
storage or disposal facilities from complying with the hazardous waste man-
agement plan if the exemption is in the public interest and consistent with
state and federal law. If the director exempts classes or categories of haz-
ardous waste treatment, storage or disposal facilities from complying with
the hazardous waste management plan, rules and regulations shall be promul-
gated in compliance with chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code, specifically in-
dicating the exemption.
SECTION 9. That Chapter 66, Title 39, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 10. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.